Utah statutes.
31A-8a-208.   Representing or aiding an unauthorized insurer.

(1)  The provisions of this chapter and Chapter 15, Unauthorized Insurers, Surplus Lines, and Risk Retention Groups, apply to the activities of an unlicensed health discount program operator as if the health discount program was an unauthorized insurance contract and the unlicensed health discount program operator was an unauthorized insurer.

(2)  A person who knowingly and intentionally represents or aids an unauthorized insurer in violation of the provisions of this chapter or Chapter 15, Unauthorized Insurers, Surplus Lines, and Risk Retention Groups, is guilty of a third degree felony.

